test/src/morphology/V-wapam_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Verb - wâpam - ok : # Ordinary IA verb - full paradigm
     wâpam+V+IA+Ind+Prs+1Sg+3SgO: niwâpamâw
     wâpam+V+IA+Ind+Prs+2Sg+3SgO: kiwâpamâw
     wâpam+V+IA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+3SgO: wâpama
     wâpam+V+IA+Ind+Prs+3oSg+3SgO: wâpama
     wâpam+V+IA+Ind+Prs+3iSg+3SgO: wâpama
     wâpam+V+IA+Ind+Prs+1Pl+3SgO: niwâpamânân
     wâpam+V+IA+Ind+Prs+12Pl+3SgO: kiwâpamânâw
     wâpam+V+IA+Ind+Prs+2Pl+3SgO: kiwâpamâwâw
     wâpam+V+IA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+3SgO: wâpamêwak
     
#     wâpam+V+IA+Neg+Ind+Prs+1Sg+3SgO: niwâpamsiin
#     wâpam+V+IA+Neg+Ind+Prs+2Sg+3SgO: kiwâpamsiin
#     wâpam+V+IA+Neg+Ind+Prs+3Sg+3SgO: wâpamsiin
#     wâpam+V+IA+Neg+Ind+Prs+3oSg+3SgO: wâpamsiiwan
#     wâpam+V+IA+Neg+Ind+Prs+3iSg+3SgO: wâpamsiim
#     wâpam+V+IA+Neg+Ind+Prs+1Pl+3SgO: niwâpamsiimin
#     wâpam+V+IA+Neg+Ind+Prs+12Pl+3SgO: kiwâpamsiimin
#     wâpam+V+IA+Neg+Ind+Prs+2Pl+3SgO: kiwâpamsiim
#     wâpam+V+IA+Neg+Ind+Prs+3Pl+3SgO: wâpamsiiwag

     wâpam+V+IA+Cnj+1Sg+3SgO: wâpamyân
     wâpam+V+IA+Cnj+2Sg+3SgO: wâpamyan
     wâpam+V+IA+Cnj+3Sg+3SgO: wâpamt
     wâpam+V+IA+Cnj+3oSg+3SgO: wâpamnid
     wâpam+V+IA+Cnj+3iSg+3SgO: wâpamng
     wâpam+V+IA+Cnj+1Pl+3SgO: wâpamyaang
     wâpam+V+IA+Cnj+12Pl+3SgO: wâpamyang
     wâpam+V+IA+Cnj+2Pl+3SgO: wâpamyeg
     wâpam+V+IA+Cnj+3Pl+3SgO: wâpamwaad
     wâpam+V+IA+Neg+Cnj+1Sg+3SgO: wâpamsiwaan
     wâpam+V+IA+Neg+Cnj+2Sg+3SgO: wâpamsiwan
     wâpam+V+IA+Neg+Cnj+3Sg+3SgO: wâpamsig
     wâpam+V+IA+Neg+Cnj+3oSg+3SgO: [wâpamsinid, wâpamsinig]
     wâpam+V+IA+Neg+Cnj+3iSg+3SgO: wâpamsing
     wâpam+V+IA+Neg+Cnj+1Pl+3SgO: wâpamsiwaang
     wâpam+V+IA+Neg+Cnj+12Pl+3SgO: wâpamsiwang
     wâpam+V+IA+Neg+Cnj+2Pl+3SgO: wâpamsiweg
     wâpam+V+IA+Neg+Cnj+3Pl+3SgO: wâpamsiwaa

     wâpam+V+IA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+3SgO: wâpamn
     wâpam+V+IA+Imp+Imm+1Pl+3SgO: wâpamdaa
     wâpam+V+IA+Imp+Imm+2Pl+3SgO: [wâpamk, wâpamg]
     wâpam+V+IA+Imp+Int+2Sg+3SgO: wâpamken
     wâpam+V+IA+Imp+Int+1Pl+3SgO: wâpamsiidaa
     wâpam+V+IA+Imp+Int+2Pl+3SgO: wâpamkegon
     wâpam+V+IA+Imp+Dur+2Sg+3SgO: wâpamkan
     wâpam+V+IA+Imp+Dur+2Pl+3SgO: wâpamkeg
